Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.080

Election of officers upon approval of plan of government by voters.

If the majority of votes cast at an election for organization under a plan provided in this title favor the plan, the city or town shall elect in accordance with RCW 35A.02.050 the officers for the positions created. The former officers of the municipality shall, upon the election and qualification of the new officers, deliver to the proper officers of the new noncharter code city all books of record, documents and papers in their possession belonging to such municipal corporation before reorganization.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.080.]

NOTES: